Illinois, session 104th, SB3093.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Sections 21-1 and 21-8 and by adding Section 2-5.05 6as follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/2-5.05 new)8    Sec. 2-5.05. Critical infrastructure facility. "Critical 9infrastructure facility" means:10        (1) any one of the following, if completely enclosed 11    by a fence or other physical barrier that is obviously 12    designed to exclude intruders:13            (A) a petroleum or alumina refinery;14            (B) an electrical power generating facility, 15        substation, switching station, electrical control 16        center, or electric power lines, and associated 17        equipment infrastructure;18            (C) a chemical, polymer, or rubber manufacturing 19        facility;20            (D) a water intake structure, water treatment 21        facility, wastewater treatment plant, or pump station;22            (E) a natural gas compressor station;23            (F) a liquid natural gas terminal or storage   SB3093- 2 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        facility;2            (G) a telecommunications central switching office;3            (H) a wireless telecommunications infrastructure, 4        including cell towers, telephone poles and lines, 5        including fiber optic lines;6            (I) a port, railroad switching yard, railroad 7        tracks, trucking terminal, or other freight 8        transportation facility;9            (J) a gas processing plant, including a plant used 10        in the processing, treatment or fractionation of 11        natural gas or natural gas liquids;12            (K) a transmission facility used by a federally 13        licensed radio or television station;14            (L) a steelmaking facility;15            (M) a facility identified and regulated by the 16        United States Department of Homeland Security Chemical 17        Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS) program;18            (N) a dam that is regulated by the State or federal 19        government;20            (O) a natural gas distribution utility facility, 21        including, but not limited to, pipeline 22        interconnections, a city gate or town border station, 23        metering station, aboveground piping, regulator 24        station, or natural gas storage facility;25            (P) a crude oil or refined products storage and 26        distribution facility, including, but not limited to,   SB3093- 3 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        valve sites, pipeline interconnections, pump station, 2        metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or 3        piping, or truck loading or off-loading facility or an 4        aboveground pipeline that is under construction that 5        is clearly marked that entry is forbidden;6            (Q) a nuclear facility as defined in Section 3 of 7        the Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act; 8            (R) a manufacturing facility that is engaged in 9        activities described in Codes 3111 through 339999 of 10        the 2017 North American Industry Classification System 11        (NAICS); 12            (S) a coal mine; or 13            (T) a mining operation, including any processing 14        equipment, batching operation, or support facility for 15        that mining operation; or 16        (2) any aboveground portion of an oil, gas, hazardous 17    liquid or chemical pipeline, tank, railroad facility, or 18    other storage facility that is enclosed by a fence or 19    other physical barrier.  20    (720 ILCS 5/21-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 21-1)21    Sec. 21-1. Criminal damage to property. 22    (a) A person commits criminal damage to property when he 23or she: 24        (1) knowingly damages any property of another; 25        (2) recklessly by means of fire or explosive damages   SB3093- 4 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1    property of another; 2        (3) knowingly starts a fire on the land of another; 3        (4) knowingly injures a domestic animal of another 4    without his or her consent; 5        (5) knowingly deposits on the land or in the building 6    of another any stink bomb or any offensive smelling 7    compound and thereby intends to interfere with the use by 8    another of the land or building; 9        (6) knowingly damages any property, other than as 10    described in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 11    20-1, with intent to defraud an insurer; 12        (7) knowingly shoots a firearm at any portion of a 13    railroad train;14        (8) knowingly, without proper authorization, cuts, 15    injures, damages, defaces, destroys, or tampers with any 16    fire hydrant or any public or private fire fighting 17    equipment, or any apparatus appertaining to fire fighting 18    equipment; or19        (9) intentionally, without proper authorization, opens 20    any fire hydrant; or21        (10) intentionally damages, destroys, or tampers with 22    equipment in a critical infrastructure facility without 23    authorization from the critical infrastructure facility. 24    (b) When the charge of criminal damage to property 25exceeding a specified value is brought, the extent of the 26damage is an element of the offense to be resolved by the trier   SB3093- 5 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1of fact as either exceeding or not exceeding the specified 2value. 3    (c) It is an affirmative defense to a violation of 4paragraph (1), (3), or (5), or (10) of subsection (a) of this 5Section that the owner of the property or land damaged 6consented to the damage. 7    (d) Sentence.8        (1) A violation of subsection (a) shall have the 9    following penalties: 10            (A) A violation of paragraph (8) or (9) is a Class 11        B misdemeanor.12            (B) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), 13        or (6) is a Class A misdemeanor when the damage to 14        property does not exceed $500.15            (C) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5), 16        or (6) is a Class 4 felony when the damage to property 17        does not exceed $500 and the damage occurs to property 18        of a school or place of worship or to farm equipment or 19        immovable items of agricultural production, including 20        but not limited to grain elevators, grain bins, and 21        barns or property which memorializes or honors an 22        individual or group of police officers, fire fighters, 23        members of the United States Armed Forces, National 24        Guard, or veterans.25            (D) A violation of paragraph (4) is a Class 4 26        felony when the damage to property does not exceed   SB3093- 6 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        $10,000.2            (E) A violation of paragraph (7) is a Class 4 3        felony.4            (F) A violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5) or 5        (6) is a Class 4 felony when the damage to property 6        exceeds $500 but does not exceed $10,000.7            (G) A violation of paragraphs (1) through (6) is a 8        Class 3 felony when the damage to property exceeds 9        $500 but does not exceed $10,000 and the damage occurs 10        to property of a school or place of worship or to farm 11        equipment or immovable items of agricultural 12        production, including but not limited to grain 13        elevators, grain bins, and barns or property which 14        memorializes or honors an individual or group of 15        police officers, fire fighters, members of the United 16        States Armed Forces, National Guard, or veterans.17            (H) A violation of paragraphs (1) through (6) is a 18        Class 3 felony when the damage to property exceeds 19        $10,000 but does not exceed $100,000.20            (I) A violation of paragraphs (1) through (6) is a 21        Class 2 felony when the damage to property exceeds 22        $10,000 but does not exceed $100,000 and the damage 23        occurs to property of a school or place of worship or 24        to farm equipment or immovable items of agricultural 25        production, including but not limited to grain 26        elevators, grain bins, and barns or property which   SB3093- 7 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        memorializes or honors an individual or group of 2        police officers, fire fighters, members of the United 3        States Armed Forces, National Guard, or veterans.4            (J) A violation of paragraphs (1) through (6) is a 5        Class 2 felony when the damage to property exceeds 6        $100,000. A violation of paragraphs (1) through (6) is 7        a Class 1 felony when the damage to property exceeds 8        $100,000 and the damage occurs to property of a school 9        or place of worship or to farm equipment or immovable 10        items of agricultural production, including but not 11        limited to grain elevators, grain bins, and barns or 12        property which memorializes or honors an individual or 13        group of police officers, fire fighters, members of 14        the United States Armed Forces, National Guard, or 15        veterans.16            (K) A violation of paragraph (10) is a Class 4 17        felony when the damage to property does not exceed 18        $500.19            (L) A violation of paragraph (10) is a Class 3 20        felony when the damage to property exceeds $500 but 21        does not exceed $10,000.22            (M) A violation of paragraph (10) is a Class 2 23        felony when the damage to property exceeds $10,000. 24        (1.5) A person may be liable in a civil action for 25    money damages to the owner of the critical infrastructure 26    facility for any damage resulting from a violation of   SB3093- 8 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1    paragraph (10). A person may also be liable to the owner 2    for court costs and reasonable attorney's fees resulting 3    from a violation of paragraph (10). 4        (2) When the damage to property exceeds $10,000, the 5    court shall impose upon the offender a fine equal to the 6    value of the damages to the property. 7        (3) In addition to any other sentence that may be 8    imposed, a court shall order any person convicted of 9    criminal damage to property to perform community service 10    for not less than 30 and not more than 120 hours, if 11    community service is available in the jurisdiction and is 12    funded and approved by the county board of the county 13    where the offense was committed. In addition, whenever any 14    person is placed on supervision for an alleged offense 15    under this Section, the supervision shall be conditioned 16    upon the performance of the community service. 17        The community service requirement does not apply when 18    the court imposes a sentence of incarceration. 19        (4) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed for 20    a violation of this Section, if a person is convicted of or 21    placed on supervision for knowingly damaging or destroying 22    crops of another, including crops intended for personal, 23    commercial, research, or developmental purposes, the 24    person is liable in a civil action to the owner of any 25    crops damaged or destroyed for money damages up to twice 26    the market value of the crops damaged or destroyed.   SB3093- 9 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        (5) For the purposes of this subsection (d), "farm 2    equipment" means machinery or other equipment used in 3    farming. 4(Source: P.A. 98-315, eff. 1-1-14; 99-631, eff. 1-1-17.) 5    (720 ILCS 5/21-8)6    Sec. 21-8. Criminal trespass to a critical infrastructure 7nuclear facility. 8    (a) A person commits criminal trespass to a critical 9infrastructure nuclear facility when he or she intentionally 10knowingly and without lawful authority, and with intent to 11damage, destroy, or tamper with equipment of the facility: 12        (1) enters or remains within a critical infrastructure 13    nuclear facility or on the grounds of a critical 14    infrastructure nuclear facility, after receiving notice 15    before entry that entry to the critical infrastructure 16    nuclear facility is forbidden; 17        (2) remains within the critical infrastructure 18    facility or on the grounds of the facility after receiving 19    notice from the owner or manager of the facility or other 20    person authorized by the owner or manager of the facility 21    to give that notice to depart from the facility or grounds 22    of the facility; or23        (3) enters or remains within a critical infrastructure 24    nuclear facility or on the grounds of a critical 25    infrastructure nuclear facility, by presenting false   SB3093- 10 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1    documents or falsely representing his or her identity 2    orally to the owner or manager of the facility. This 3    paragraph (3) does not apply to a peace officer or other 4    official of a unit of government who enters or remains in 5    the facility in the performance of his or her official 6    duties. 7    (a-5) In this Section, "with intent to damage, destroy, or 8tamper with equipment of the facility" means actions that 9create a serious risk for loss of human life, serious risk of 10harm to public health, or a serious risk of significant damage 11to the environment. 12    (b) A person has received notice from the owner or manager 13of the facility or other person authorized by the owner or 14manager of the facility within the meaning of paragraphs (1) 15and (2) of subsection (a) if he or she has been notified 16personally, either orally or in writing, or if a printed or 17written notice forbidding the entry has been conspicuously 18posted or exhibited at the main entrance to the facility or 19grounds of the facility or the forbidden part of the facility.20    (b-5) This Section does not apply to: 21        (1) any person or organization:22            (i) monitoring or attentive to compliance with 23        public or worker safety laws, wage and hour 24        requirements, or other statutory requirements;25            (ii) picketing occurring at the workplace that is 26        otherwise lawful and arises out of a bona fide labor   SB3093- 11 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1        dispute including any controversy concerning wages, 2        salaries, hours, working conditions or benefits, 3        including health and welfare, sick leave, insurance, 4        and pension or retirement provisions, the managing or 5        maintenance of collective bargaining agreements, and 6        the terms to be included in those agreements; or 7            (iii) engaged in union organizing or recruitment 8        activities including attempting to reach workers 9        verbally, in writing with pamphlets and in the 10        investigation of non-union working conditions, or 11        both; or 12        (2) an exercise of the right of free speech or 13    assembly that is otherwise lawful. Nothing in this 14    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be 15    deemed to limit or impede the right to free speech or 16    assembly, including, but not limited to, protesting and 17    picketing. 18    (c) (Blank). In this Section, "nuclear facility" has the 19meaning ascribed to it in Section 3 of the Illinois Nuclear 20Safety Preparedness Act.21    (d) Sentence. Criminal trespass to a critical 22infrastructure nuclear facility is a Class 4 felony punishable 23by a fine of not less than $1,000, imprisonment, or both. 24    (e) A person may also be liable in a civil action for money 25damages to the owner of the critical infrastructure facility 26for any damage to personal or real property of the facility   SB3093- 12 -LRB104 18940 RLC 32385 b1resulting from the trespass. A person may also be liable to the 2owner for court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. 3(Source: P.A. 97-1108, eff. 1-1-13.)